Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3295
Carrier, defined.

Carrier shall mean a health maintenance organization, an insurer, or any other entity responsible for the payment of benefits or the provision of services under a group contract.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 4.